District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.18

Conversion of convertible spaces; amendment of declaration and bylaws; recordation; status of convertible space not converted.

(a)

The declarant may convert all or any portion of any convertible space into 1 or more units or common elements, or both, including without limitation, limited common elements, subject to any restrictions and limitations which the condominium instruments may specify. Any such conversion shall be deemed to have occurred at the time of the recordation of appropriate instruments pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and § 42-1902.14(d).

(b)

Simultaneously with the recording of plats and plans pursuant to § 42-1902.14(d), the declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration describing the conversion. Such amendment shall assign an identifying number to each unit formed out of a convertible space and shall allocate to each unit a portion of the undivided interest in the common elements appertaining to that space. Such amendment shall describe or delineate the limited common elements formed out of the convertible space, showing or designating the unit or units to which each is assigned.

(c)

If all or any portion of any convertible space is converted into 1 or more units in accordance with this section, the declarant shall prepare, execute, and record simultaneously with the amendment to the declaration, an amendment to the bylaws. The amendment to the bylaws shall reallocate votes in the unit owners’ association, rights to future common profits, and liabilities for future common expenses not specially assessed, all as in the case of the subdivision of a unit in accordance with § 42-1902.26(d).

(d)

Any convertible space not converted in accordance with the provisions of this section, or any portion or portions thereof not so converted, shall be treated for all purposes as a single unit until and unless it is so converted, and the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed applicable to any such space, or portion or portions thereof, as though the same were a unit.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 218, 23 DCR 9532b

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1901.02 and § 42-1902.26.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1828.
1973 Ed., § 5-1228.